Washington statutes.
RCW 43.371.040

Claims data and database—Exempt from public disclosure—Not subject to subpoena or compulsory process.

(1) The claims data provided to the database, the database itself, including the data compilation, and any raw data received from the database are not public records and are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) Claims data obtained, distributed, or reported in the course of activities undertaken pursuant to or supported under this chapter are not subject to subpoena or similar compulsory process in any civil or criminal, judicial, or administrative proceeding, nor may any individual or organization with lawful access to data under this chapter be compelled to provide such information pursuant to subpoena or testify with regard to such data, except that data pertaining to a party in litigation may be subject to subpoena or similar compulsory process in an action brought by or on behalf of such individual to enforce any liability arising under this chapter.

[ 2015 c 246 s 4; 2014 c 223 s 12.]

NOTES:

Finding—2014 c 223: See note following RCW 41.05.690.